District of Columbia statutes.
22-4101

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-274, § 2, 44 DCR 1232
Oct. 14, 1999, D.C. Law 13-49, § 6, 46 DCR 5153
July 11, 2000, D.C. Law 13-137, § 19, 47 DCR 797
1981 Ed., § 24-1101.
Section 19 of D.C. Law 13-110 repealed the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1996, §§ 24-1101 to 24-1117 1981 Ed. .
Section 21 (b) of D.C. Law 13-110 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect or upon the effective date of the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1999, whichever occurs first.
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-133, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6771).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Legislative Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-176, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9244).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-229, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 487).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-308, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2714).